Utah statutes.
65A-2-4.   State land management plans -- Division to adopt rules for
notifying and consulting with interested parties.
(1)  The division shall adopt rules for notifying and consulting with
interested parties including the general public, resources users, and federal,
state, and local agencies on state land management plans.
(2)  Division rules shall provide:
(a)  for reasonable notice and comment periods; and
(b)  that the division respond to all commenting parties and give the
rationale for the acceptance or nonacceptance of the comments.
